Utah statutes.
34-38-5.   Time of testing -- Cost of testing and transportation.
(1)  Any drug or alcohol testing by an employer shall occur during or
immediately after the regular work period of current employees and shall be
deemed work time for purposes of compensation and benefits for current
employees.
(2)  An employer shall pay all costs of testing for drugs or alcohol required
by the employer, including the cost of transportation if the testing of a
current employee is conducted at a place other than the workplace.
